Vermont, session 2025-2026, H681.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 564 is added to read:
§ 564. SCHOOL CLOSURE
(a) Before closing a school that operates grades prekindergarten through
grade 12, or any subset of such grades, or before closing or relocating one or
more individual grades, a school district shall obtain the affirmative vote of the
town in which the school or grades facing closure are located.
VT LEG #385429 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.681
2026 Page 2 of 3
(b) As used in this section, “school board” and “school district” have the
same meanings as in subdivisions 11(a)(9) and (10) of this title.
(c) The provisions of this section shall supersede any educational charter
provision or school district articles of agreement to the contrary.
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. § 563 is amended to read:
§ 563. POWERS OF SCHOOL BOARDS; FORM OF VOTE
The school board of a school district, in addition to other duties and
authority specifically assigned by law:
* * *
(7) May relocate or discontinue use of a schoolhouse or facility, subject
to the provisions of sections 564, 821, and 822 of this title.
* * *
Sec. 3. 16 V.S.A. § 562 is amended to read:
§ 562. POWERS OF ELECTORATE
At a school district meeting, the electorate:
* * *
(7) May authorize the school board to enter into leases of real property
for more than three years, to purchase buildings or sites for school purposes, to
locate and erect schoolhouses, and to sell, or otherwise dispose of,
schoolhouses or sites for same, subject to the provisions of section 564 of this
chapter.
VT LEG #385429 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.681
2026 Page 3 of 3
* * *
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385429 v.5